Alabama, session 2026rs, HB425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the period commencing on October 1,
2026, and ending on September 30, 2029, Sleep in Heavenly
Peace, Inc. is exempt from paying state sales and use taxes.
(b) Sleep in Heavenly Peace, Inc. may be exempted from
paying county or municipal sales and use taxes upon approval
of the county or municipality pursuant to Section 40-23-4.01.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 1